Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Chapter 12 Administration of Estates of Missing Persons

Cross references. —

As to administration of estates generally, see §

2-7-501

et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

1 Am. Jur. 2d Absentees § 1 et seq.

1 C.J.S. Absentees § 1 et seq.

§ 2-12-101.
Filing of petition; information to be shown; appointing day for hearing.

Whenever any resident of this state who owns or is entitled to the possession of any real or personal property situate therein is missing, or his whereabouts is unknown for ninety (90) days, and a verified petition is presented to the court of the county of which the missing person is a resident representing that the whereabouts of the missing person has been for such time and still is unknown, that his estate requires attention, supervision and care of ownership, and setting forth the names, ages and residence of the relatives of the missing person who would be heirs at law were the missing person deceased, the court shall order the petition to be filed and appoint a day for hearing the petition not less than ten (10) days from the date of the order.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 133, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 4-27; W. S. 1977, §

4-6-101

; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-12-102.
Publication of notice of hearing; service on persons named in petition.

The clerk shall publish not less than twice during the ten (10) days prior to the day appointed a notice in some newspaper published in the county, stating that the petition will be heard at the courtroom of the court at the time appointed for the hearing. The clerk shall cause personal service of the notice of hearing to be served upon all persons named in the petition as heirs of the missing person should he be deceased resident in the county, and cause to be mailed by certified mail a copy of the notice addressed to each of the supposed heirs at their address shown in the petition. The court may direct further notice of the filing of the petition be given in such manner and to such persons as it may deem proper.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 133, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 4-28; W.S. 1977, § 4-6-102; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-12-103.
Hearing on petition; appointment of trustee.

At the time fixed for the hearing or at any subsequent time to which the hearing may be continued, the court shall hear the petition and the evidence offered in support of or in opposition thereto. If satisfied that the allegations thereof are true and that the person remains missing and the whereabouts of the person are unknown, the court shall appoint some suitable person as trustee to take charge and possession of the estate and to manage, hold and control the same subject to the direction of the court.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 133, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 4-29; W.S. 1977, § 4-6-103; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-12-104.
Preference in appointing trustee.

In appointing a trustee, the court shall give preference to the wife or husband of the missing person or their nominee, and in the absence of a husband or wife, some person willing to act and entitled to participate in the distribution of the missing person’s estate were he or she deceased, or a creditor of the missing person.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 133, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 4-30; W.S. 1977, § 4-6-104; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-12-105.
Bond of trustee.

Every person appointed trustee under the provisions of the preceding section [§

2-12-104

] shall give bond to the state of Wyoming with two (2) or more sufficient sureties, or surety bond, conditioned for the faithful performance of his duties, to be approved by the court or clerk thereof. In form the bond shall be joint and several and the penalty shall be not less than the value of the personal property and the probable value of the annual rents, profits and issues of real property belonging to the missing person, which value shall be ascertained by the court or clerk thereof by examining on oath the petitioner in the petition and any other person deemed by the court or clerk to have information or knowledge of such value. The sureties shall justify on written oath attached to the bond in an amount equal in the aggregate to the penalty thereof.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 133, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 4-31; W.S. 1977, § 4-6-105; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

§ 2-12-106.
Trustee to take possession of property; powers and duties generally; removal of trustee; sale of property.

The trustee shall take possession of the real and personal estate in this state of the missing person and collect, receive and receipt for and hold subject to the order of the court the rents, income, issues, profits and proceeds thereof and all indebtedness owing to the missing person and pay out of the trust funds the expenses of the trust and any indebtedness of the missing person authorized by the court. The court may direct the trustee to pay to the family of the missing person such money for family expenses and support from the income of the trust estate as the court from time to time may determine. When directed by the court, the trustee shall account to the court for all of the trustee’s acts as trustee, and the court may at any time upon good cause shown remove any trustee and appoint another.

When a sale of the real or personal property of the estate of a missing person is necessary to pay the allowance of the family or the debts outstanding against the missing person or the expenses of administration of the trust, or when it appears to the court it is for the best interest of all persons interested in the estate, the trustee may sell any real or personal property of the estate upon order of the court.

The trustee in obtaining an order of sale and in conducting a sale of property of the estate of a missing person shall follow all the steps and procedure set forth in article 6 of chapter 7, Wyoming Probate Code relating to the sale of property of a decedent.

History.

Laws 1947, ch. 133, § 6; 1953, ch. 73, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 4-32; W.S. 1977, § 4-6-106; Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 3; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to removal and replacement of fiduciaries, see §§

2-3-136

to

2-3-138

.